Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-3807
Federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990; applicability.

An individual born with a diagnosis of a disorder or difference in sex development shall have the relevant legal protections and accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended.

Laws 2025, LB89, § 7.